Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 5 Divorce and Separation
15-5-16.2.
Child support.

In a proceeding for divorce, divorce from bed and board, a miscellaneous petition without the filing of divorce proceedings, or child support, the court shall order either or both parents owing a duty of support to a child to pay an amount based upon a formula and guidelines adopted by an administrative order of the family court. If, after calculating support based upon court established formula and guidelines, the court, in its discretion, finds the order would be inequitable to the child or either parent, the court shall make findings of fact and shall order either or both parents owing a duty of support to pay an amount reasonable or necessary for the child’s support after considering all relevant factors including, but not limited to:

The financial resources of the child;

The financial resources of the custodial parent;

The standard of living the child would have enjoyed had the marriage not been dissolved;

The physical and emotional condition of the child and his or her educational needs; and

The financial resources and needs of the noncustodial parent, provided, that in establishing a child support order, incarceration may not be treated as voluntary unemployment.

The court may, if in its discretion it deems it necessary or advisable, order child support and education costs for children attending high school at the time of their eighteenth (18th) birthday and for ninety (90) days after graduation, but in no case beyond their nineteenth (19th) birthday.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the court, in its discretion, may order child support, in the case of a child with a severe physical or mental impairment still living with or under the care of a parent, beyond the child’s emancipation as defined above. The court shall consider the following factors when making its determination: (1) The nature and extent of the disability; (2) The cost of the extraordinary medical expenses; (3) The ability of the child to earn income; (4) The financial resources of the child; (5) The financial resources of the parents; (6) The inability of the primary caregiver of the child to sustain gainful employment on a full-time basis due to the care necessitated by the child. The onset of the disability must have occurred prior to the emancipation event. If a child support order for a child with a severe physical or mental impairment has been terminated, suspended, or expired, the court shall consider the factors in this paragraph and has the discretion to order child support for this child prospectively based upon established child support guidelines. The court may periodically review the case to determine if circumstances warrant the continuation of child support.

The court may, if in its discretion it deems it necessary or advisable, appoint an attorney or a guardian ad litem to represent the interest of a minor or dependent child with respect to his or her support, custody, and visitation.

In determining whether an appointment should be made, the court shall consider the extent to which a guardian ad litem may assist in providing information concerning the best interest of the child; the age of the child; the wishes of the parents, as well as their financial resources; the nature of the proceeding including the level of contentiousness, allegations of child abuse, or domestic violence and the risk of harm to the child if a guardian is not appointed; or conflicts of interest between the child and parents or siblings;

The guardian ad litem shall be appointed from a list of persons properly credentialed pursuant to administrative orders of the chief judge of the family court;

The court shall enter an order of appointment stating the specific assignment, the optional and mandatory duties of the guardian ad litem, the guardian’s access to the child and confidential information regarding the child, and a provision for payment of the costs and fees of the guardian ad litem;

Communications made to a guardian, including those made by a child, are not privileged and may or may not be disclosed to the parties, the court, or to professionals providing services to the child or the family;

The guardian ad litem shall meet with the child, conduct an investigation, and upon request of the court, shall prepare an oral or written report that contains the procedural background of the case, identification of all persons interviewed and other sources of information, a statement of the child’s emotional, medical, educational, and social service needs, the child’s wishes, and other factors relevant to the court’s determination regarding the best interests of the child;

Any written report of the guardian ad litem shall be marked as a full exhibit in the proceedings, subject to cross-examination;

If the guardian ad litem requests confidential healthcare information and consent is withheld, he or she shall apply to the court for leave to obtain such information after compliance with §

5-37.3-6.1

;

The guardian ad litem shall be given notice of and should appear at all proceedings in family court that affect the interests of the child;

A person serving as a guardian ad litem under this section acts as the court’s agent and is entitled to quasi-judicial immunity for acts performed within the scope of the duties of the guardian ad litem;

The chief judge of the family court shall issue, through administrative orders, rules governing the appointment and performance of guardians ad litem in domestic proceedings.

After a decree for support has been entered, the court may, from time to time upon the petition of either party, or by the state in accordance with subsection (c)(3) of this section, review and alter its decree relative to the amount of support and the payment of it, and may make any decree relative to it that it might have made in the original suit. The decree may be made retroactive in the court’s discretion only to the date that notice of a petition to modify was given to the adverse party if the court finds that a substantial change in circumstances has occurred; provided, that the court shall set forth in its decision the specific findings of fact that show a substantial change in circumstances and upon which findings of facts the court has decided to make the decree retroactive. In modifying the order, incarceration may not be treated as voluntary unemployment that would prevent the motion from being heard or result in a denial of the motion. The child support order shall continue in full force and effect, by wage withholding, after the youngest child is emancipated, and shall be applied towards any arrearage due and owing, as indicated on the child-support computer system. Upon satisfaction of the arrears due and owing the child-support order shall be automatically suspended and wage withholding terminated without the necessity of returning to family court.

When the department of human services, office of child support services, becomes aware of the fact, through an electronic data exchange of information with the department of corrections, or by any other means, that the noncustodial parent is or will be incarcerated for one hundred eighty (180) days or more, the department may automatically file a motion to modify or a motion for relief, to be heard before the court via a video conference hearing or other type of hearing. A specific request for the filing of this motion need not be made in writing or otherwise by the incarcerated, noncustodial parent, but the parent shall be notified of the hearing and provided a meaningful opportunity to respond. The court shall schedule a hearing to determine the noncustodial parent’s ability to pay, taking into consideration the assets and financial resources and any benefits the noncustodial parent may be receiving, the length of the sentence, and shall modify or suspend all child support orders, after setting forth in its decision specific findings of fact that show circumstances upon which the court has decided to modify or suspend all child support orders during the period of incarceration. Upon the obligor’s release, the department of human services, office of child support services, shall file a motion for support, and a hearing shall be scheduled to determine the obligor’s ability to begin paying child support pursuant to the child support guidelines in effect. This section does not apply to those individuals who are serving a sentence for criminal nonsupport in state or federal prison, or who are found to be in civil contempt for failure to pay child support and incarcerated for that reason.

In a proceeding to enforce a child support order, or a spousal support order for a custodial parent having custody of a minor child, the court or its magistrate may assign to the obligee such tangible personal property of the obligor that will be sufficient to satisfy the child or spousal support arrearage owed. The court or its magistrate, after a hearing, shall establish the amount of the child or spousal support arrearage, and the nature and value of the tangible personal property. To effect the assignment, the court or its magistrate may order the obligor to execute and deliver the documents of title that may be necessary to complete the transfer of title to the property, and may order the obligor to deliver possession of the property to the obligee. Whenever the obligor fails to comply with the order assigning the property, the order of assignment shall be regarded as a judgment vesting title to the property in the obligor as fully and completely as if the obligor had executed and delivered the documents of title.

Any order for child support issued by the family court shall contain a provision requiring either or both parents owing a duty of support to a child to obtain health insurance coverage for the child when coverage is available to the parent or parents through their employment without cost or at a reasonable cost. “Reasonable cost” shall be defined in accordance with guidelines adopted by administrative order of the family court in conjunction with the child support guidelines.

Any existing child support orders may be modified in accordance with this subsection unless the court makes specific written findings of fact that take into consideration the best interests of the child and conclude that a child support order or medical order would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case.

In addition, the national medical support notice shall be issued with respect to all orders issued, enforced, or modified on or after October 1, 2002, in accordance with chapter 29 of title 15. The notice shall inform the employer of provisions in the child support order, for healthcare coverage for the child, and contain instructions on how to implement this coverage. In lieu of the court ordering the noncustodial parent to obtain or maintain healthcare coverage for the child, the court may order the noncustodial parent to contribute a weekly cash amount towards the medical premium for healthcare coverage paid by the state of Rhode Island and/or the custodial parent. The method to determine a reasonable weekly amount shall be addressed in the family court administrative order pertaining to the child support guidelines.

In a proceeding to establish support, the court in its discretion may, after opportunity for a hearing, issue a temporary order for child support payable into the registry of the court and to be held pending entry of judgment. In the event of a final adjudication requiring no payment or payments in an amount less than those payments that have been made pursuant to a temporary order under this section, the defendant shall be entitled to a refund of all or a portion of the amounts paid.

In any proceeding to establish support, or in any case in which an obligor owes past-due support, for a child or children receiving public assistance pursuant to chapter 5.1 of title 40, the court or its magistrate, upon a finding that an able-bodied absent parent obligor is unemployed, underemployed, or lacks sufficient income or resources from which to make payment of support equal to the public assistance payment for the child or children, or is unable to pay the arrearages in accordance with a payment plan, may order that parent to perform unpaid community service for at least twenty (20) hours per week through community service placements arranged and supervised by the department of human services or to participate in any work activities that the court deems appropriate. The performance of community service shall not be a basis for retroactive suspension of arrears due and owing.

In any proceeding to establish support for a minor child whose adjudicated parent is a minor (minor-parent), the court or its magistrate may order a grandparent of the minor child to reimburse the department of human services in an amount not to exceed the total amount of cash assistance benefits paid to or for the minor child pursuant to chapter 5.1 of title 40 until the minor-parent reaches the age of eighteen (18), less any payment made to the department by the minor parent.

The obligation of reimbursement for the minor child shall be the joint and several responsibility of the minor parent and the grandparent(s) until the minor parent reaches the age of eighteen (18); provided, that each joint obligor shall have a right of contribution against each joint obligor, which right shall be enforceable by an action in the family court.

All support orders established or modified in the state on or after October 1, 1998, shall be recorded with the Rhode Island family court department of human services child-support-enforcement computer system, which maintains the official registry of support orders entered in accordance with applicable administrative orders issued by the Rhode Island family court. The support order shall be recorded whether or not services are being provided under the IV-D state plan.

The obligee to a paternity or child support proceeding shall be required to file with the family court, upon the entry of the order, the appropriate form as provided by family court that includes the full name of the parties, residential and mailing address, telephone number, drivers license number, social security number, and the name, address, and telephone number of the employer. The form shall also include the full order amount and date and amount of arrearages if any, the name of the child(ren), their date of birth, address, social security number, and any other information as required by administrative order.

After this, each party is required to file an amended form, whenever any of the information contained on the original form has been changed in any way, within ten (10) days of the change. The information shall be entered in the child-support-enforcement computer system within five (5) business days of receipt of the amended form.

In any subsequent child-support-enforcement action between the parties, upon sufficient showing that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of such a party, the court may deem state due process requirements for notice and service of process to be met with respect to the party, upon service by first class mail or, where appropriate, by service as specified in the Rhode Island rules of procedure for domestic relations for the family court of Rhode Island, of written notice to the most recent residential or employer address of record.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 279, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 281, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 8; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 311, § 1.

15-5-16.2.1.
Credit rating.

Credit bureaus are required to take into consideration a non-custodial parent’s child support obligations and his or her delinquencies in this regard, and these delinquencies shall be verified by either the court or by the bureau of family support.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 406, § 1.

15-5-16.2.2.
Service of court papers at work.

No employer in this state is permitted to refuse or obstruct the service of family court process relating to child or spousal support upon an employee at the place of employment and the service shall not be grounds for dismissal of the employee. The employer may designate an area where the service may be effected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 406, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 407, § 1.

15-5-16.2.3.
Continuances — Compensation for lost wages.

In any matter related to child support or support for a custodial parent having custody of a minor child, except when a continuance is mutually agreed upon, the court may, in its discretion, order a party requesting a continuance to compensate the other party for wages lost as a result of court attendance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 406, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 407, § 1.

15-5-16.2.4.
Retroactive modification of child support.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

15-5-16.2

, the court, in its discretion, may modify a child support order retroactively only to the date that notice of a petition to modify was given to the adverse party if it finds that a substantial change in circumstances has occurred. The court shall set forth in its decision the specific findings of fact which show a substantial change in circumstances and upon which findings of fact the court has decided to make its order of modification retroactive. The court, in its discretion, may for good cause shown suspend payment of child support arrearages until there is a finding by the court of financial ability to make payment on arrearages; provided, that incarceration for nonpayment of child support shall not constitute good cause to suspend payment of child support or child support arrearages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 287, § 1.

15-5-16.2.5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 5; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 314, § 2, effective October 1, 2002. For present comparable provisions, see chapter 29 of this title.

15-5-16.3.
Allowance regarded as judgment for debt.

Any allowance or order made by the family court pursuant to §§

15-5-16

and

15-5-16

.2 shall be regarded as a judgment for debt so that suits may be brought or executions may issue on it for amounts due and unpaid, from time to time, to be shown by affidavits of the person entitled to the amounts due and the attorney of record of the person, the executions to run against the goods and chattels of the husband or wife, as the case may be; and the court may make all necessary orders and decrees concerning the suits or executions, and the court at any time may alter, amend, and annul for sufficient cause, after notice to the interested parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 279, § 2.

15-5-16.4.
Judgment assigning real property — Effect.

Whenever the assignment of real property is ordered by the family court pursuant to §

15-5-16.1

and the court directs that a deed, conveyance, or release of any real estate or interest in real estate shall be made, the judgment shall create an equitable right to its enforcement, subject to the provisions for recording of notice in chapter 13 of title 34, in the party entitled to the assignment by judgment; and if the judgment has not been complied with at the time the judgment of divorce becomes final and the judgment is subsequently recorded in the manner provided for in chapter 13 of title 34, then the judgment shall operate to vest title to the real estate or interest in the real estate in the party entitled to it by the judgment as fully and completely as if the deed, conveyance, or release had been duly executed by the party directed to make it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 279, § 2.

15-5-16.5.
Interest on arrearages.

Interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum on any support debt due or owing, child or spousal support, shall be assessed unless the responsible party shall, for good cause shown, be relieved of the obligation to pay interest by the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 1.

15-5-16.6.
Security, bond, or guarantee to secure payment of overdue support.

In a proceeding to enforce overdue support, as defined in subsection (b) of this section, the court or its magistrate, after a hearing and a finding of overdue support, may require an obligor parent to give security, post a bond, or give some other guarantee to secure payment of overdue support; the security, bond, or guarantee is to be in any amount, for any term, and upon any conditions that the court or magistrate shall deem necessary or advisable. The court may order that the security, bond, or other guarantee be deposited into the registry of the family court. The obligor parent shall be served with the notice of any proceeding under this section and the notice shall state the procedures to contest the action.

For purposes of this section, “overdue support” means a delinquency pursuant to an obligation determined under a court order, or an order of an administrative process established under the law of any state, for:

Support and maintenance of a minor child, which is owed to or on behalf of the child; or

Support and maintenance of the obligor parent’s spouse or former spouse with whom the child is living.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 8.

15-5-16.7.
Review of child support orders.

For purposes of this section, a “child support order” means a child support order enforceable pursuant to the Rhode Island state plan for support enforcement as further defined in §

15-16-5(a)

.

Every three (3) years from the date the child support order was established or modified, and upon the request of either party, or upon the request of the state pursuant to §

15-5-16.2(c)

(3), the court shall review and, if appropriate, adjust the order in accordance with the child support guidelines if the amount of the child support award under the order differs from the amount that would be awarded in accordance with the guidelines. The adjustment of the order shall be made under this subsection without a requirement for proof or showing of a change in circumstances. In adjusting the order, incarceration may not be treated as voluntary unemployment that would prevent the motion from being heard or result in a denial of the motion. The periodic review of child support orders as provided in this subsection is in addition to the opportunity for review provided in §

15-5-16.2(c)

.

In the case of a request for a review before the three-year (3) period, upon the request of either party, or upon the request of the state pursuant to §

15-5-16.2

(c)(3), the amount of support may, in the court’s discretion, be modified if the court finds that a substantial change in circumstances has occurred in accordance with §

15-5-16.2

. The court, in its discretion, may modify a child support order retroactively only to the date that notice of a petition to modify was given to the adverse party if the court finds that a substantial change in circumstances has occurred; provided, that the court shall set forth in its decision the specific findings of fact that show a substantial change in circumstances and upon which findings of facts the court has decided to make the decree retroactive.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 177, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 263, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 311, § 1.

15-5-17.
Change of name.

Any woman, to whom a divorce from the bond of marriage is decreed, shall, upon request, be authorized by the decree to change her name, notwithstanding that there may be children born of the marriage, and subject to the same rights and liabilities as if her name had not been changed. This statute is in addition to, and not in abrogation of, the common law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-17

; P.L. 1982, ch. 434, § 1.

15-5-18.
Interlocutory decrees and injunctions.

After the filing and during the pendency of any petition for divorce, the court may make any interlocutory decrees and grant any temporary injunctions that may be necessary until a hearing can be had before the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-18

.

15-5-19.
Restraining orders — Treatment for harmed or menaced spouse — Custody of children — Allowances — Alimony and counsel fees.

Whenever either party to a marriage is insane, or whenever a cause is in existence which is, or if continued, will be a cause for divorce, the family court, upon the original petition of one of the parties, or upon the filing of a complaint for divorce, may restrain either party from interfering with the personal liberty of the other, and may restrain either party from maliciously causing or attempting to cause bodily harm to the other, with or without a dangerous weapon, and may restrain either party from placing, by physical menace or threat of physical menace, the other in fear of imminent bodily injury; and upon a finding by the court that any party has been so harmed, menaced, or threatened the court may prescribe treatment including, but not limited to, out-patient counseling, and may regulate the custody and provide for the education, maintenance, and support of the children, if any, and may, in its discretion, order one of the parties to pay alimony and/or counsel fees to the other pursuant to §

15-5-16

, which allowance shall not be regarded as a judgment for debt until the court, which made the order for maintenance and support of the children, alimony for one or the other of the parties, and counsel fees, has adjudicated in appropriate proceedings what, if anything, is due under the order. Suits may be brought or executions may issue for amounts due and unpaid, the executions to run against the goods and chattels of the husband or wife, as the case may be; the court may make all necessary orders and decrees concerning the suits or executions and at any time may alter, amend, or annul for sufficient cause, after notice to the interested parties.

Any violation of the protective orders mentioned in subsection (a) of this section shall subject the defendant to being found in contempt of court.

The contempt order shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude any other available civil or criminal remedies.

Any violation of a restraining order under this chapter protecting a person against bodily harm and/or against threat of imminent bodily injury shall be a misdemeanor which shall be punished by a fine of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. The penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties provided in §

12-29-5

. The district court has criminal jurisdiction over violations of restraining orders protecting the person of the complainant against bodily harm and/or against the threat of imminent bodily injury.

In regulating the custody of the children, the court shall provide for the reasonable right of visitation by the natural parent not having custody of the children except upon the showing of cause as to why the right should not be granted. The court shall mandate compliance with its orders by both the custodial parent and the children. In the event of noncompliance, the non-custodial parent may file a motion for contempt in family court. Upon a finding by the court that its order for visitation has not been complied with, the court shall exercise its discretion in providing a remedy, and define the non-custodial parent’s visitation in detail. However, if a second finding of noncompliance by the court is made, the court shall consider this to be grounds for a change of custody to the non-custodial parent.

In all hearings regarding denial of visitation, the court shall make findings of fact.

This chapter does not affect the right of the family court to award alimony or support pendente lite.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 20; P.L. 1954, ch. 3309, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-19

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1978, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 279, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 406, § 6; P.L. 1981, ch. 320, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 5.

Parties.

On a petition for relief without commencement of divorce proceedings, equitable rules apply and it is not necessary for a party to be the one commencing the proceedings as a result of a suit brought under the statute in order to avail himself of a just defense. Gomes v. Gomes,

93 R.I. 87

, 171 A.2d 446,

1961 R.I. LEXIS 84

(1961).

15-5-19.1.
Restraining orders — Notification of local authorities — Notice of penalty.

The clerk of the family court may, if requested by the prevailing party’s attorney, immediately forward a certified copy of any restraining order issued pursuant to §

15-5-19

(a) to the police department of the municipality in which the prevailing party is domiciled, and the police department shall retain the restraining order on file for at least one year.

The clerk shall also provide the prevailing party and/or his or her attorney with two (2) certified copies of any restraining order issued pursuant to §

15-5-19

.

Each restraining order issued under this chapter, including a temporary ex parte order, shall be set out on a separate piece of paper and shall have the following statement printed in bold faced type or in capital letters:

A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS ORDER MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND MAY BE PUNISHED BY A FINE OF AS MUCH AS ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($1,000) OR BY CONFINEMENT IN JAIL FOR AS LONG AS ONE YEAR AND MAY BE ORDERED TO ATTEND COUNSELING.

The clerk of the family court may have a certified copy of any order issued under this chapter forwarded immediately to the law enforcement agency designated by the plaintiff. The clerk shall also provide the plaintiff with two (2) certified copies of any order issued under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 433, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 5; P.L. 1997, ch. 308, § 2.

15-5-20.
Service on or notice to defendant.

No person shall be entitled to a divorce from the bond of marriage unless the defendant, in accordance with rules adopted by the court, has been personally served with process if within the state, or with personal notice duly authenticated if out of the state, or unless the defendant has entered an appearance in the cause; or unless it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the petitioner does not know the address nor the residence of the defendant and has not been able to ascertain either after reasonable and due inquiry and search for six (6) months, in which case the court, or in vacation a judge of the court, may authorize notice by publication of the pendency of the petition for divorce to be given in a manner provided by law; provided, that in cases where indigence has been established, the court may, as an alternative to publication and upon motion and in appropriate circumstance, authorize an alternate means of service of process in the manner provided by Rule 4 of the Family Court Rules of Procedure for Domestic Relations.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 17; P.L. 1902, ch. 971, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-20

; P.L. 1999, ch. 332, § 1.

15-5-21.
Service by publication — Jurisdiction acquired.

After service of process on any petition, whether by citation or by publication, where the adverse party has no attorney of record and cannot be found for the service of citation or notice of any motion or any other matter arising in the course of the proceedings, the court may order service by publication and the service shall have the same effect as personal service within the state on the party; provided, that the service shall not, in the case of an adverse party who has not appeared either in person or by attorney, and the petition against him or her was served by publication, authorize the entry of any decree or order binding the party personally to pay any sum of money or to do any other affirmative act.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 17; P.L. 1939, ch. 707, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-21

.

15-5-22.
Trial required — Collusion.

No divorce from the bond of marriage shall be granted solely upon default nor solely upon admissions by the pleadings, except upon trial before the court in open session; nor shall the divorce be granted where the court is satisfied that there has been any collusion or corrupt conduct by the parties, or either of them, in regard to the proceedings to obtain the divorce.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 18; P.L. 1902, ch. 971, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-22

; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 25.

15-5-23.
Final judgment — Remarriage.

No judgment for a divorce shall become final and operative until three (3) months after the trial and decision. Final decree from the bond of marriage may be entered ex parte and in chambers on the suggestion of the prevailing party at any time within one hundred eighty (180) days next after the expiration of three (3) months from the date of decision. After the expiration of the one hundred eighty (180) days, final decrees may be entered only in open court and on motion or upon written consent of the attorneys or parties. Notice of the filing of the motion shall not be required in cases in which the original complaint is unanswered.

After entry of the final judgment for a divorce from the bond of marriage, either party may marry again.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 195, § 19; P.L. 1902, ch. 971, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 247, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 291, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 416, § 19; P.L. 1939, ch. 707, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 945, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

15-5-23

; P.L. 1976, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 14, § 1.